Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2232.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7308(c) of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 7308. Maintenance of records.* * *(c) Disagreement with record accuracy.--* * *(1.1) If the law enforcement agency refuses to correct or remove a portion of the separation record under paragraph (1), the law enforcement officer may file an appeal of the law enforcement agency's determination in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to judicial review).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819